Utah statutes.
17B-1-626.   Loans by one fund to another.

Subject to restrictions imposed by bond covenants, statute, or other controlling regulations, the board of trustees of a local district may authorize interfund loans from one fund to another at interest rates, repayment terms, and conditions prescribed by the board of trustees.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

